District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.10

Detention of United States prisoners in Washington Asylum and Jail.

The Department of Corrections is hereby authorized and directed to receive and keep in the Washington Asylum and Jail all prisoners committed thereto for offenses against the United States.

Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 1003, ch. 192
“Department of Corrections” was substituted for “Board of Public Welfare” pursuant to § 24-211.03.
1973 Ed., § 24-410.
1981 Ed., § 24-410.